Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.170

Filing fee.

(1)(a) The attorney general may petition for the appointment of a guardian, conservator, or other protective arrangement under RCW 11.130.270, 11.130.365, and 11.130.595 in which there is cause to believe that a guardianship, conservatorship, or protective arrangement is necessary and no private party is able and willing to petition.

(b) Prepayment of a filing fee shall not be required in any guardianship, conservatorship, or protective arrangement proceeding brought by the attorney general. Payment of the filing fee shall be ordered from the estate of the respondent person at the hearing on the merits of the petition, unless in the judgment of the court, such payment would impose a hardship upon the respondent, in which case the filing shall be waived.

(2) No filing fee shall be charged by the court for filing a petition for guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective arrangement filed under RCW 11.130.270, 11.130.365, and 11.130.595 if the petition alleges that the respondent has total assets of a value of less than three thousand dollars.

(3) No filing fee shall be charged by the court for filing a petition for guardianship or conservatorship filed under Article 2 of this chapter, where the potential guardian is a relative and not a professional guardian or conservator.

[ 2019 c 437 s 134.]